Arkansas, session 2025, HB1880.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-61-303(3), concerning the definition of
"medical emergency" within the Arkansas Human Life Protection Act, is amended
to read as follows:
(3) “Medical emergency” means a condition in which an abortion
is necessary to preserve the life or health of a pregnant woman whose life or
health is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical
injury, including a life-endangering or health-endangering physical condition
caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself; and
*JMB327*
03/20/2025 1:54:53 PM JMB327

HB1880

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-61-304(a), concerning the prohibitions
under the Arkansas Human Life Protection Act, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person shall not purposely perform or attempt to perform an
abortion except:
(1) To to save the life or health of a pregnant woman in a
medical emergency;
(2) When the pregnancy is the result of incest for which a
report has been filed with a law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney's
office alleging the offense of incest, § 5-26-202, or the sexual assault of a
minor;
(3) When the pregnancy is the result of a rape for which a
report has been filed with a law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney's
office alleging the offense of rape, § 5-14-103; or
(4) In the case of a fetal abnormality incompatible with life.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-61-403(3), concerning the definition of
"medical emergency" within the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(3) “Medical emergency” means a condition in which an abortion
is necessary to preserve the life or health of a pregnant woman whose life or
health is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical
injury, including a life-endangering or health-endangering physical condition
caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself; and

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-61-404(a), concerning the prohibitions
under the Arkansas Unborn Child Protection Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) A person shall not purposely perform or attempt to perform an
abortion except:
(1) To to save the life or health of a pregnant woman in a
medical emergency;
(2) When the pregnancy is the result of incest for which a
report has been filed with a law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney's
office alleging the offense of incest, § 5-26-202, or the sexual assault of a
minor;
03/20/2025 1:54:53 PM JMB327

HB1880
(3) When the pregnancy is the result of a rape for which a
report has been filed with a law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney's
office alleging the offense of rape, § 5-14-103; or
(4) In the case of a fetal abnormality incompatible with life.
































03/20/2025 1:54:53 PM JMB327